Alabama, session 2026rs, HB333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"athletic association" has the same meaning as provided in
Section 16-1-52.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(b) Solely for purposes of classifying public high
schools for competition in athletic association championship
programs or other interscholastic athletic events, an athletic
association of which a public high school is a member shall
Page 1

association of which a public high school is a member shall
HB333 INTRODUCED
adjust the school's athletic classification to reflect the
number of English language learner students enrolled at the
school who do not participate in any interscholastic athletic
events.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to
implement this section.
(d) This section shall apply beginning with the
athletic classifications in effect for the 2028-2029 academic
school year.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2